Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1473.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2007-H. Department approval for campus closures.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) The Commonwealth provides substantial funding to State-related universities.(2) As a publicly funded land-grant university, The Pennsylvania State University has a duty to provide educational opportunities to all Pennsylvanians, including 1234567891011121314151617181920 those individuals in rural and underprivileged areas.(3) The closure of a branch campus without a plan to maintain regional access to quality higher education is an inappropriate use of taxpayer dollars.(4) State-related universities must provide alternative educational options to students prior to considering campus closures.(b) Duty to submit alternative education plan.--Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and continuing each school year thereafter, if a State-related university intends to close a campus, the State-related university shall submit an alternative education plan to the department prior to the closure. The plan shall outline the educational opportunities in the region for students and may include:(1) a partnership with a public institution of higher education to ensure continued access to postsecondary education in the region;(2) satellite classroom programs that allow students to complete their degrees locally; or(3) a tuition assistance program to assist with the costs for affected students who must travel for continued education.(c) Review of plan by department.--(1) The department shall review an alternative education plan submitted under subsection (b).(2) If the department determines that the plan complies with the requirements of this section, the department shall approve the plan.(3) If the department determines that the plan does not comply with the requirements of this section, the department 20250HB1473PN1734 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall disapprove the plan and notify the State-related university of the disapproval and the reason for the disapproval.(4) The State-related university may resubmit to the department a plan within 30 days of the disapproval.(5) The department shall review a resubmitted plan for compliance with the requirements of this section and proceed under paragraph (2) or (3), as applicable.(6) If the department fails to make a determination on a plan submitted under this section within 30 days of receipt of the plan, the plan shall be deemed disapproved.(d) Effect of noncompliance.--If a State-related university fails to submit a plan as required under this section or the department disapproves a plan, the State-related university may not receive payment from an appropriation for that fiscal year.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related university.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology."State-related university." The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University and their branch campuses.20250HB1473PN1734 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1473PN1734 - 4 - 1